District of Columbia statutes.
4-1303.73

Dissemination of rights and responsibilities information.

(a)

When a youth comes under the care of the Agency, the Agency shall inform the youth of the youth’s rights and disseminate to the youth and the appropriate care providers the Statements of Rights and Responsibilities.

(b)

The Agency shall disseminate the Statements of Rights and Responsibilities and related information to youth and individuals who entered care before April 23, 2013.

(c)

The Agency shall incorporate the Statements of Rights and Responsibilities into scheduled trainings for social workers and other affected partners, including providers, foster parents, and other persons who are associated with the care of youth.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title III-C, § 373
as added Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-276, § 2, 60 DCR 2060
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-274 added this section.